Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-355
Federal savings and loan; associations organized under laws of Nebraska; rights, privileges, benefits, and immunities; exception.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of Chapter 8, article 3, or any other Nebraska statute, except as provided in section 8-345.02, any association incorporated under the laws of the State of Nebraska and organized under the provisions of such article shall have all the rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities which may be exercised as of January 1, 2025, by a federal savings and loan association doing business in Nebraska. Such rights, powers, privileges, benefits, and immunities shall not relieve such association from payment of state taxes assessed under any applicable laws of this state.

Laws 1971, LB 185, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1288, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 351, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 784, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 201, § 1;

Laws 1976, LB 763, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 224, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 717, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 154, § 2;

Laws 1980, LB 865, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 71, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 646, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 144, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 923, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 128, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 1052, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 115, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 858, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 207, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 1016, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 98, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 470, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 985, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 288, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 876, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 41, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 949, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 35, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 67;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 12;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 16;

Laws 2001, LB 53, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 217, § 11;

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 533, § 19;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB124, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB851, § 11;

Laws 2009, LB327, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB890, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB74, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 11;

Laws 2013, LB213, § 8;

Laws 2014, LB712, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB286, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB676, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 134;

Laws 2018, LB812, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB258, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 11;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 19;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 44;

Laws 2025, LB251, § 12.